src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k44_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    bróðir+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bróðir
    bróðir+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: bróður
    bróðir+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: bróður
    bróðir+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: bróður
    bróðir+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: brøður
    bróðir+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: brøður
    bróðir+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: brøðrum
    bróðir+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: brøðra
    bróðir+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: bróðirin
    bróðir+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: bróðurin
    bróðir+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [bróðurinum, bróðrinum]
    bróðir+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: bróðursins
    bróðir+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: brøðurnir
    bróðir+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: brøðurnar
    bróðir+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: brøðrunum
    bróðir+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: brøðranna
